Vermont, session 2025-2026, S262.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 23 V.S.A. § 1222 is amended to read:
§ 1222. INSPECTION OF REGISTERED VEHICLES
(a)(1) Except for school buses, which shall be inspected as prescribed in
section 1282 of this title, and motor buses as defined in subdivision 4(17) of
this title, which shall be inspected twice during the calendar year at six-month
intervals, all motor vehicles registered in this State with a gross vehicle weight
rating of 10,000 pounds or more shall undergo a safety and visual emissions
inspection once each year and all motor vehicles with a gross vehicle weight
VT LEG #385956 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.262
2026 Page 2 of 2
rating of 10,000 pounds or more that are registered in this State and are
16 model years old or less shall undergo an emissions or on board diagnostic
(OBD) systems inspection once each year as applicable.
(2) Any motor vehicle, required to be inspected pursuant to subdivision
(1) of this subsection (a) or any trailer, or semi-trailer not currently inspected
in this State shall be inspected within 15 days following the date of its
registration in the State of Vermont.
(3) A used motor vehicle offered for sale by a dealer shall undergo a
safety and visual emissions inspection prior to being sold, and a used vehicle
offered for sale by a dealer that is 16 model years old or less shall undergo an
emissions or on board diagnostic (OBD) systems inspection prior to being
sold.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2027.
VT LEG #385956 v.1